Utah statutes.
75-5b-502.   Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b), 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2008 General Session

